test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kala_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kala: # Noun 'fish / kala' - full paradigm
     kala+N+Sg+Nom: kala
     kala+N+Sg+Gen: kalan
     kala+N+Sg+Acc: [kala, kalan]
     kala+N+Sg+Par: kalua
     kala+N+Sg+Tra: kalakse
     kala+N+Sg+Abe: [kalata, kalattah]
     kala+N+Sg+Com: kalanke
     kala+N+Sg+Ine: kalas
     kala+N+Sg+Ela: [kalaspäi, kalas]
     kala+N+Sg+Ill: kalah
     kala+N+Sg+Ade: kalal
     kala+N+Sg+Abl: [kalalpäi, kalal]
     kala+N+Sg+All: kalale
     kala+N+Sg+Ess: kalannu
     kala+N+Sg+Ter: kalassah
     kala+N+Sg+Apr: kalalluo
     kala+N+Pl+Nom: kalat
     kala+N+Pl+Gen: kalojen
     kala+N+Pl+Acc: kalat
     kala+N+Pl+Par: kaloi
     kala+N+Pl+Tra: kaloikse
     kala+N+Pl+Abe: [kaloita, kaloittah]
     kala+N+Pl+Com: kalojenke
     kala+N+Pl+Ine: kalois
     kala+N+Pl+Ela: [kaloispäi, kalois]
     kala+N+Pl+Ill: kaloih
     kala+N+Pl+Ade: kaloil
     kala+N+Pl+Abl: [kaloilpäi, kaloil]
     kala+N+Pl+All: kaloile
     kala+N+Pl+Ess: kaloinnu
     kala+N+Pl+Ins: kaloin
     kala+N+Pl+Apr: kalojelluo
     kala+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: kalagi
     kala+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: kalangi
     kala+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [kalagi, kalangi]
     kala+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: kaluagi
     kala+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: kalaksegi
     kala+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [kalatagi, kalattahgi]
     kala+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: kalankegi
     kala+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: kalasgi
     kala+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [kalaspäigi, kalasgi]
     kala+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: kalahgi
     kala+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: kalalgi
     kala+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [kalalpäigi, kalalgi]
     kala+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: kalalegi
     kala+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: kalannugi
     kala+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: kalassahgi
     kala+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: kalalluogi
     kala+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: kalatgi
     kala+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: kalojengi
     kala+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: kalatgi
     kala+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: kaloigi
     kala+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: kaloiksegi
     kala+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [kaloitagi, kaloittahgi]
     kala+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: kalojenkegi
     kala+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: kaloisgi
     kala+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [kaloispäigi, kaloisgi]
     kala+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: kaloihgi
     kala+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: kaloilgi
     kala+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [kaloilpäigi, kaloilgi]
     kala+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: kaloilegi
     kala+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: kaloinnugi
     kala+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: kaloingi
     kala+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: kalojelluogi
